North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113B. North Carolina Energy Policy Act of 1975.
Article 3. Revenues From Offshore Energy Production.

§ 113B-30.
(Contingent effective date — see notes) Allocation of revenues from offshore energy production; creation of Offshore Energy Management Fund.

Any revenues and royalties paid to the State as a result of offshore leasing, exploration, development, and production of all energy resources shall be deposited in the Offshore Emergency Fund until the Fund reaches two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000). The Offshore Energy Management Fund is an interest-bearing special revenue fund to be established within the State treasury. This Fund shall be used only for emergency preparation, emergency response, emergency environmental protection, or mitigation associated with a release of liquid hydrocarbons or associated fluids directly related to offshore energy exploration, development, production, or transmission. Once the Fund balance reaches the amount of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000), the funds shall be used as provided in subsection (b) of this section. If monies are withdrawn from this Fund to carry out the provisions in this section, all revenues and royalties paid to the State as a result of offshore leasing, exploration, development, and production of all energy resources shall be deposited in the Fund until a total of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) is reestablished. Once the Fund balance reaches the amount of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000), the funds shall be used as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Any revenues and royalties paid to the State as a result of offshore leasing, exploration, development, and production of all energy resources in excess of the amount needed to establish the Fund created in subsection (a) of this section are annually appropriated and shall be used for the following purposes:

Seventy-five percent (75%) of such revenues and royalties shall be credited to the General Fund.

Five percent (5%) of such revenues and royalties shall be credited to the North Carolina Highway Trust Fund established under G.S. 136-176.

Five percent (5%) of such revenues and royalties shall be transferred to the Community Colleges System Office to establish and manage a fund for curriculum development and implementation as well as financial assistance for students attending community college to receive vocational training through this curriculum in fields directly related to energy exploration and development and related energy infrastructure.

Five percent (5%) of such revenues and royalties shall be transferred to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina System to establish and manage research and development funds for programs directly related to energy research and development.

Five percent (5%) of such revenues and royalties shall be transferred to the Department of Environmental Quality for conservation, protection, and mitigation, including, but not limited to, beach and inlet management projects, dredging operations, channel navigation and maintenance, public beach and water access, water quality management, and habitat restoration.

Three percent (3%) of such revenues and royalties shall be transferred to the State Ports Authority for expansion and maintenance of State Port infrastructure associated with energy-related commerce.

Two percent (2%) of such revenues and royalties shall be transferred to the Department of Commerce for recruitment of energy-related industries to the State.

History.

2013-365, s. 6; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-365, s. 10, provides:
“G.S. 113B-30, enacted by Section 6 of this act, becomes effective only if authorized by the General Assembly in the Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2013. The first report due pursuant to

G.S. 113B-12

, as amended by Section 8(m) of this act, shall be transmitted on or before January 1, 2014. Except as otherwise provided, the remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.” The Revisor of Statutes is informed that no appropriation was made in the 2013 Regular Session; consequently, this section is not effective.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (b)(5).